bg-BG: Съвместим диаметър на тежест за щанга: И двете (1 инч и 2 инча); Не е приложимо; Олимпийски 2 инча (50 мм); Стандартен 1 инч (25 мм); Друг
de: Kompatibler Hantelscheibendurchmesser: Beide (1 Zoll und 2 Zoll); Nicht zutreffend; Olympisch, 2 Zoll (50 mm); Standard, 1 Zoll (25 mm); Sonstige
da: Kompatibel vægtskivediameter: Både 1 tomme og 2 tommer; Ikke relevant; Olympisk 2 tommer (50 mm); Standard 1 tomme (25 mm); Andet
cs: Kompatibilní průměr závaží: Jak 1 in, tak 2 in; Nelze použít; Olympijské 2 in (50 mm); Standardní 1 in (25 mm); Jiné
nl: Compatibele diameter gewichtsschijf: Zowel 1 als 2 inch; Niet van toepassing; Olympisch 2 inch (50 mm); Standaard 1 inch (25 mm); Overige
pt-PT: Diâmetro da anilha compatível: Ambos 1 e 2 polegadas; Não aplicável; Olímpico 2 polegadas (50 mm); Padrão 1 polegada (25 mm); Outro
hu: Kompatibilis súlytárcsaátmérő: 1 col és 2 col is; Nem alkalmazható; Olimpiai 2 col (50 mm); Szabványos 1 hüvelyk (25 mm); Egyéb
sl-SI: Združljiv premer uteži: Oboje, 1 palec in 2 palca; Ni primerno; Olimpijski, 2 palca (50 mm); Standardni, 1 palec (25 mm); Drugo
vi: Đường kính đĩa tạ tương thích: Cả 1 in và 2 in; Không áp dụng; Tiêu chuẩn Olympic 2 in (50 mm); Tiêu chuẩn 1 in (25 mm); Khác
pl: Kompatybilna średnica obciążenia: Zarówno 1 cal, jak i 2 cale; Nie dotyczy; Olimpijskie 2 cale (50 mm); Standardowe 1 cal (25 mm); Inne
ko: 호환 중량판 직경: 1인치 및 2인치 모두; 해당 없음; 올림픽 2인치(50mm); 표준 1인치(25mm); 기타
tr: Uyumlu ağırlık plakası çapı: Hem 1 inç hem 2 inç; Geçerli değil; Olimpik 2 inç (50 mm); Standart 1 inç (25 mm); Diğer
pt-BR: Diâmetro da placa de peso/anilha compatível: Ambos 1 pol. e 2 pol.; Não aplicável; Olímpico 2 pol. (50 mm); Padrão 1 pol. (25 mm); Outro
fr: Diamètre de disque de poids compatible: Les deux (1 po et 2 po); Sans objet; Olympique 2 po (50 mm); Standard 1 po (25 mm); Autre
th: เส้นผ่านศูนย์กลางของแผ่นน้ำหนักที่เข้ากันได้: ทั้ง 1 นิ้วและ 2 นิ้ว; ไม่ระบุ; มาตรฐานโอลิมปิก 2 นิ้ว (50 มม.); มาตรฐาน 1 นิ้ว (25 มม.); อื่นๆ
fi: Yhteensopiva painolevyn halkaisija: Sekä 1 tuuma että 2 tuumaa; Ei sovellu; Olympia 2 tuumaa (50 mm); Vakio 1 tuuma (25 mm); Muu
zh-CN: 适配配重片直径: 1 英寸和 2 英寸两者皆可; 不适用; 奥林匹克 2 英寸 (50 mm); 标准 1 英寸 (25 mm); 其他
sv: Kompatibel skivdiameter: Både 1 tum och 2 tum; Ej tillämpligt; Olympisk 2 tum (50 mm); Standard 1 tum (25 mm); Övrigt
en: Compatible weight plate diameter: Both 1 in and 2 in; Not applicable; Olympic 2 in (50 mm); Standard 1 in (25 mm); Other
sk-SK: Kompatibilný priemer závažia: Oboje 1 palec a 2 palce (25 mm a 50 mm); Nerelevantné; Olympijské 2 palce (50 mm); Štandardné 1 palec (25 mm); Iné
nb: Kompatibel vektplatediameter: Både 1 tomme og 2 tommer; Ikke aktuelt; Olympisk 2 tommer (50 mm); Standard 1 tomme (25 mm); Annet
lt-LT: Suderinamas svorio disko skersmuo: Tiek 1 col., tiek 2 col.; Netaikoma; Olimpinis 2 col. (50 mm); Standartinis 1 col. (25 mm); Kita
zh-TW: 相容的槓鈴片直徑: 1 吋與 2 吋皆可; 不適用; 奧林匹克 2 吋 (50 公釐); 標準 1 吋 (25 公釐); 其他
el: Συμβατή διάμετρος πλάκας βάρους: Και 1 in και 2 in; Δεν ισχύει; Ολυμπιακού τύπου 2 in (50 mm); Τυπική 1 in (25 mm); Άλλο
it: diametro della piastra di peso compatibile: Entrambi (1 in e 2 in); Non applicabile; Olimpico 2 in (50 mm); Standard 1 in (25 mm); Altro
ro-RO: Diametrul discului de greutate compatibil: Ambele 1 in. și 2 in.; Nu se aplică; Olimpic 2 in. (50 mm); Standard 1 in. (25 mm); Altele
ru: Совместимый диаметр дисков: Оба: 1 дюйм и 2 дюйма; Не применимо; Олимпийский 2 дюйма (50 мм); Стандартный 1 дюйм (25 мм); Другое
hr-HR: Kompatibilni promjer ploče s utezima: I 1 in i 2 in; Nije primjenjivo; Olimpijske od 2 in (50 mm); Standardne od 1 in (25 mm); Ostalo
ja: 互換性のあるウェイトプレートの直径: 1インチ/2インチ両方; 該当なし; オリンピック 2インチ (50 mm); スタンダード 1インチ (25 mm); その他
es: Diámetro de la placa de peso compatible: Ambos (1 pulg. y 2 pulg.); No corresponde; Olímpico 2 pulg. (50 mm); Estándar 1 pulg. (25 mm); Otro